Utah statutes.
63E-1-402.   Benefits to interested parties of an independent entity.
(1)  If an independent entity is privatized, the following may not receive any
benefit prohibited under Subsection (2):
(a)  an interested party of the independent entity;
(b)  an entity in which an interested party holds a business interest;
(c)  a lobbyist of the independent entity; or
(d)  an entity in which a lobbyist of the independent entity holds a business
interest.
(2)  If an independent entity is privatized:
(a)  a person described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) may not receive:
(i)  compensation from an independent entity that is conditioned in whole or
in part on:
(A)  the passage, defeat, or amendment of legislative action related to
privatization; or
(B)  the approval, modification, or denial of an executive action related to
privatization; or
(ii)  any asset of the independent entity or its successor; and
(b)  a person described in Subsection (1)(c) or (d) may not receive any:
(i)  compensation that if received by the lobbyist would be in violation of
Section 36-11-301; or
(ii)  asset of the independent entity or its successor.
(3)  Subsection (2)(a)(ii) does not apply to funds in a loan program
administered by an independent entity if:
(a)  the funds were provided by an entity other than the state or were derived
from those funds, including loan payments, interest, and other charges paid by
borrowers;
(b)  the person described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) who receives the funds
assumes all duties and obligations of the independent entity:
(i)  under the contract with the entity that provided the initial funding; and
(ii)  relating to the loan program;
(c)  separate records have been maintained regarding the use of the funds;
(d)  the funds may only be used for purposes specified in an agreement with
the entity that provided the initial funding; and
(e)  the funds may only be transferred to a person described in Subsection
(1)(a) or (b) if the transfer is approved by the entity that provided the
initial funding.
